Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.115

Outreach and feedback—Working group—Model feedback tools and strategies.

(1) Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, each school shall conduct outreach and seek feedback from a broad and diverse range of parents, other individuals, and organizations in the community regarding their experiences with the school. The school shall summarize the responses in its annual report under RCW 28A.655.110.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall create a working group with representatives of organizations representing parents, teachers, and principals as well as diverse communities. The working group shall also include a representative from the *achievement gap oversight and accountability committee. By September 1, 2010, the working group shall develop model feedback tools and strategies that school districts may use to facilitate the feedback process required in subsection (1) of this section. The model tools and strategies are intended to provide assistance to school districts. School districts are encouraged to adapt the models or develop unique tools and strategies that best fit the circumstances in their communities.

[ 2010 c 235 s 702.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "achievement gap oversight and accountability committee" was renamed the "educational opportunity gap oversight and accountability committee" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 33.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.